Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.321] FACE COVERING OPT OUT. new text end new text begin A school district or charter school that requires students to wear face coverings in school buildings or on school grounds must allow a parent to opt their child out of the face covering requirement. A parent may opt their child out of a face covering requirement by notifying the school board, principal, or a person having administrative control of a school site. A school district or charter school must not require a parent to provide a reason for the parent's election or to provide any evidence regarding any fact related to the child's health or education status. A school district or charter school must not discipline or otherwise treat differently any child whose parent has opted their child out of a face covering requirement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end